Illinois, session 104th, HB2819.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Organization Act is 5amended by adding Section 3.3 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 5/3.3 new)7    Sec. 3.3. Amendment germane to title. Any amendment to a 8bill that is introduced in either the House of Representatives 9or the Senate must be germane to the title of the introduced 10bill. Any amendment that is not germane to the title of the 11introduced bill shall not be considered for adoption by the 12house of the General Assembly in which the amendment is 13offered for consideration. Any member of the house of the 14General Assembly in which the amendment is offered for 15consideration may object to the introduction of the amendment 16as not being germane to the title of the introduced bill. If 17such an objection is made, the question of germaneness shall 18be presented to the respective house for consideration. If at 19least a majority of the members voting on the question 20determine that the amendment is germane to the title of the 21introduced bill, then the amendment may be considered by that 22house. If less than a majority of the members voting on the 23question determine that the amendment is germane to the title   HB2819- 2 -LRB104 06388 SPS 16424 b1of the bill, the amendment shall not be considered by that 2house.